de: Steifigkeit der Federn: Gemischt; Mittel; Weich; Steif; Sonstige
en: Feather stiffness: Assorted; Medium; Soft; Stiff; Other
da: Fjerstivhed: Assorteret; Medium; Blød; Stiv; Andet
sv: Fjäderstyvhet: Blandad; Medium; Mjuk; Styv; Övrigt
es: Rigidez de la pluma: Surtido; Media; Suave; Rígida; Otra
ro-RO: Rigiditatea penei: Asortată; Medie; Moale; Rigidă; Altele
zh-CN: 羽毛硬度: 混合; 中等; 软; 硬; 其他
pt-BR: Rigidez da pena: Sortida; Média; Macia; Rígida; Outra
lt-LT: Plunksnų standumas: Įvairus; Vidutinis; Minkštas; Kietas; Kitas
hr-HR: Krutost perja: Razno; Srednje; Meko; Kruto; Ostalo
pt-PT: Rigidez da pena: Sortido; Médio; Macio; Rígido; Outro
zh-TW: 羽毛硬挺度: 綜合; 中等; 柔軟; 堅硬; 其他
bg-BG: Твърдост на перата: Смесени; Средни; Меки; Твърди; Друго
sl-SI: Togost perja: Različno; Srednje; Mehko; Trdo; Drugo
fi: Höyhenen jäykkyys: Lajitelma; Keskijäykkä; Pehmeä; Jäykkä; Muu
el: Σκληρότητα φτερού: Ποικιλία; Μέτρια; Μαλακά; Σκληρά; Άλλο
th: ความแข็งของขนนก: คละแบบ; ปานกลาง; อ่อน; แข็ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Жесткость пера: В ассортименте; Средние; Мягкие; Жесткие; Другое
nb: Fjærstivhet: Assortert; Middels; Myk; Stiv; Annet
sk-SK: Tuhosť peria: Rôzna; Stredná; Mäkká; Tuhá; Iná
hu: Toll merevsége: Vegyes; Közepes; Puha; Merev; Egyéb
tr: Tüy sertliği: Karışık; Orta; Yumuşak; Sert; Diğer
pl: Sztywność piór: Mieszana; Średnia; Miękkie; Sztywne; Inna
ko: 깃털 강성: 혼합; 중간; 부드러움; 뻣뻣함; 기타
nl: Veer stijfheid: Gemengd; Medium; Zacht; Stijf; Overig
fr: Rigidité de la plume: Assorti; Moyen; Souple; Rigide; Autre
ja: 羽毛の硬さ: アソート; ミディアム; ソフト; ハード; その他
cs: Tuhost peří: Různé; Střední; Měkké; Tuhé; Jiné
vi: Độ cứng của lông vũ: Hỗn hợp; Trung bình; Mềm; Cứng; Khác
it: Rigidità della piuma: Assortita; Media; Morbida; Rigida; Altra